Illinois, session 104th, HB952.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5changing Section 45-45 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/45-45)7    Sec. 45-45. Small businesses. 8    (a) Set-asides. Each chief procurement officer has 9authority to designate as small business set-asides a fair 10proportion of construction, supply, and service contracts for 11award to small businesses in Illinois. Advertisements for bids 12or offers for those contracts shall specify designation as 13small business set-asides. In awarding the contracts, only 14bids or offers from qualified small businesses shall be 15considered.16    (b) Small business. "Small business" means a business that 17is independently owned and operated and that is not dominant 18in its field of operation. The chief procurement officer shall 19establish a detailed definition by rule, using in addition to 20the foregoing criteria other criteria, including the number of 21employees and the dollar volume of business. When computing 22the size status of a potential contractor, annual sales and 23receipts of the potential contractor and all of its affiliates   HB0952 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 04854 SPS 14881 b1shall be included. The maximum number of employees and the 2maximum dollar volume that a small business may have under the 3rules promulgated by the chief procurement officer may vary 4from industry to industry to the extent necessary to reflect 5differing characteristics of those industries or objectives of 6the applicable small business rules. Except for contracts, 7goods, and services procured by the Department of 8Transportation, the maximum number of employees and maximum 9dollar volume shall be , subject to the following limitations:10        (1) No wholesale business is a small business if its 11    annual sales for its most recently completed fiscal year 12    exceed $13,000,000.13        (2) No retail business or business selling services is 14    a small business if its annual sales and receipts exceed 15    $8,000,000.16        (3) No manufacturing business is a small business if 17    it employs more than 250 persons.18        (4) No construction business is a small business if 19    its annual sales and receipts exceed $14,000,000.20    (b-1) For contracts, goods, and services procured by the 21Department of Transportation, no business shall be a small 22business, regardless of type, if (i) its annual sales for its 23most recently completed fiscal year exceed the small business 24size standard for its specific industry, as established by the 25U.S. Small Business Administration, or (ii) it employs more 26individuals than the number set forth in the small business   HB0952 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 04854 SPS 14881 b1size standard for its specific industry, as established by the 2U.S. Small Business Administration, whichever is applicable. 3    (c) Fair proportion. For the purpose of subsection (a), 4for State agencies of the executive branch, a fair proportion 5of construction contracts shall be no less than 25% nor more 6than 40% of the annual total contracts for construction.7    (d) Withdrawal of designation. A small business set-aside 8designation may be withdrawn by the purchasing agency when 9deemed in the best interests of the State. Upon withdrawal, 10all bids or offers shall be rejected, and the bidders or 11offerors shall be notified of the reason for rejection. The 12contract shall then be awarded in accordance with this Code 13without the designation of small business set-aside. Each 14chief procurement officer shall make the annual report 15available on his or her official website. Each chief 16procurement officer shall also issue a press release in 17conjunction with the small business annual report that 18includes an executive summary of the annual report and a link 19to the annual report on the chief procurement officer's 20website.21    (e) Small business specialist. Each chief procurement 22officer shall designate one or more individuals to serve as 23its small business specialist. The small business specialists 24shall collectively work together to accomplish the following 25duties:26        (1) Compiling and maintaining a comprehensive list of   HB0952 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 04854 SPS 14881 b1    potential small contractors. In this duty, he or she shall 2    cooperate with the Federal Small Business Administration 3    in locating potential sources for various products and 4    services.5        (2) Assisting small businesses in complying with the 6    procedures for bidding on State contracts.7        (3) Examining requests from State agencies for the 8    purchase of property or services to help determine which 9    invitations to bid are to be designated small business 10    set-asides.11        (4) Making recommendations to the chief procurement 12    officer for the simplification of specifications and terms 13    in order to increase the opportunities for small business 14    participation.15        (5) Assisting in investigations by purchasing agencies 16    to determine the responsibility of bidders or offerors on 17    small business set-asides.18    (f) Small business annual report. Each small business 19specialist designated under subsection (e) shall annually 20before November 1 report in writing to the General Assembly 21concerning the awarding of contracts to small businesses. The 22report shall include the total value of awards made in the 23preceding fiscal year under the designation of small business 24set-aside. The report shall also include the total value of 25awards made to businesses owned by minorities, women, and 26persons with disabilities, as defined in the Business   HB0952 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 04854 SPS 14881 b1Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 2Disabilities Act, in the preceding fiscal year under the 3designation of small business set-aside.4    The requirement for reporting to the General Assembly 5shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as required 6by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization Act.7(Source: P.A. 103-570, eff. 1-1-24.)